Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
CHAPTER 126 Absentee Voting [Repealed]

126.010.
Right
of absentees to vote in time of war, in federal elections. [Repealed.]

126.020.
Application
for ballot — Transmittal to local registration officials. [Repealed]

126.030.
Form
of application for ballot — Affidavit. [Repealed.]

126.040.
Verification
of registration — New registration — Lists of applicants. [Repealed.]

126.050.
Preparation
and printing of ballots. [Repealed.]

126.060.
Envelopes
for mailing ballots — Instructions for voters. [Repealed.]

126.070.
Sending
ballots, envelopes and instructions to voters. [Repealed.]

126.080.
Preparation
of ballot by voter — Mailing to Secretary of State. [Repealed.]

126.090.
Transmittal
of ballots to county clerk and election officers — Handling of late
ballots. [Repealed.]

126.100.
Manner
of casting ballots — Challenges. [Repealed.]

126.110.
Returns
of election officers. [Repealed.]

126.120.
Administering
of oaths by military and naval officers. [Repealed.]

126.130.
Jurisdiction
of offenses. [Repealed.]

126.140.
Definitions.
[Repealed.]

126.145.
Application
for registration by absent person in United States service. [Repealed.]

126.150.
Application
for ballot, when and to whom made. [Repealed.]

126.160.
Form
of application for ballot and registration — Affidavit. [Repealed.]

126.170.
Verification
of registration — Reregistration required — Oath. [Repealed.]

126.175.
Examination
of applications. [Repealed.]

126.180.
Precinct
lists of ballots. [Repealed.]

126.190.
Mailing
ballots, envelopes and instructions to voters. [Repealed.]

126.200.
Outer
envelopes for ballots. [Repealed.]

126.210.
Inner
envelope for ballots — Voter’s affidavit — Evidence. [Repealed.]

126.220.
Application
forms — Instructions for voters — Furnishing of supplies. [Repealed.]

126.230.
Preparation
of ballot by voter — Mailing to county clerk. [Repealed.]

126.240.
Ballot
boxes. [Repealed.]

126.250.
Handling
of ballots when received by county clerk — Disposition of late ballots.
[Repealed.]

126.255.
Posting
of lists of absentees. [Repealed.]

126.260.
Keeping
of locked ballot boxes. [Repealed.]

126.270.
Casting
ballots — Challenges — Tabulation of vote — Disposal of
ballots and envelopes. [Repealed.]

126.275.
Written
challenges required. [Repealed.]

126.280.
Death
of voter prior to election. [Repealed.]

126.290.
Voting
in person, procedure. [Repealed.]

126.294.
Absentee
ballot not counted, when. [Repealed.]

126.295.
Presence
of absent voter in county, ballot not counted. [Repealed.]

126.300.
Precinct
officers not to reissue ballot. [Repealed.]

126.310.
Administering
of oaths by officers of armed forces. [Repealed.]

126.320.
Cost
of postage and envelopes. [Repealed.]

126.330.
Jurisdiction
of offenses. [Repealed.]

126.990.
Penalties.
[Repealed.]